Hawaii statutes.
§454F-10 Authority to require license. In
addition to any other duties imposed upon the commissioner, the commissioner
shall require mortgage loan originators, mortgage loan originator companies,
and mortgage servicer companies to be licensed and registered through NMLS.
The commissioner is authorized to participate in NMLS. The commissioner may
establish by rule pursuant to chapter 91, requirements for mortgage loan
originators, mortgage loan originator companies, and mortgage servicer
companies, including:

(1) Background checks of:

(A) Criminal history through fingerprint or
other databases;

(B) Civil or administrative records;

(C) Credit history; and

(D) Any other source deemed necessary by NMLS;

(2) Fees to apply for or renew licenses through NMLS;

(3) The setting or resetting as necessary of license
renewal and reporting dates;

(4) Requirements for amending or surrendering a
license; and

(5) Any other activity the commissioner deems
necessary to participate in NMLS. [L Sp 2009, c 32, pt of §2; am L 2010, c 84, §17;
am L 2013, c 168, §12]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next